Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 G ENERAL PROVISIONS
12-8-32. Permits for regional solid waste disposal facilities.

Prior to submission of an application to the division for a permit for a regional solid waste disposal facility, conflicts as defined in Articles 1 and 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 50 shall follow the mediation procedures developed by the Department of Community Affairs pursuant to Articles 1 and 2 of Chapter 8 of Title 50. Upon the submission of any application to the division for any municipal solid waste disposal facility for which a permit other than a permit by rule is required by the division, the permit applicant shall within 15 days of the date of submission of the application publicize the submission by public notice and in writing as follows:

If the application is for a facility serving no more than one county, the public notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation serving the host county, and each local government in the county and the regional commission shall further be notified in writing of the permit application;

If the application is for a facility serving more than one county, the public notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation serving each affected county, and each local government within said counties and the regional commission shall be further notified in writing of the permit application; and

The public notice shall be prominently displayed in the courthouse of each notified county.

The division shall review the application and supporting data, make a determination as to the suitability or unsuitability of the proposed site for the intended purpose, and notify the applicant and the host local government if different from the applicant in writing of its determination.

Upon receipt from the division of notice that the proposed site is suitable for the intended purpose, the applicant shall within 15 days of receipt of such notification publicize the fact by public notice as outlined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section. Further, within 45 days of receipt of such notification from the division, the host local government for the proposed site shall as outlined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section advertise and hold a public meeting to inform affected residents and landowners in the area of the proposed site and of the opportunity to engage in a facility issues negotiation process.

Following notification of the applicant of the proposed site's suitability, the division may continue to review the applicant's permit application but the director shall not take any action with respect to permit issuance or denial until such time as the local notification and negotiation processes described in this Code section have been exhausted.

The division shall not be a party to the negotiation process described in this Code section, nor shall technical environmental issues which are required by law and rules to be addressed in the permitting process be considered negotiable items by parties to the negotiation process.

Within 30 days following a public meeting held in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, a facility issues negotiation process shall be initiated by the host local government upon receipt of a written petition by at least 25 affected persons, at least 20 of whom shall be registered voters of or landowners in the host jurisdiction. Multiple petitions may be consolidated into a single negotiating process. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "affected person" means a registered voter of the host local government or of a county contiguous to such host local government or a landowner within the jurisdiction of the host local government.

Within 15 days following receipt of such written petition, the host local government shall validate the petition to ensure that the petitioners meet the requirements of this Code section.

Within 15 days following the validation of the written petition to negotiate, the host local government shall notify the petitioners by publication as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section; shall notify the permit applicant if different from the host local government, the division, and the regional commission that the negotiation process is being initiated; and shall set a date for a meeting with the citizens facility issues committee, the host local government, and the permit applicant not later than 30 days following validation of such written petition to negotiate.

The petitioning persons shall select up to ten members, at least eight of whom shall be registered voters or landowners in the host local government, to serve on a citizens facility issues committee to represent them in the negotiation process. The membership of the citizens facility issues committee shall be chosen within 15 days following the validation of such written petition pursuant to this Code section.

The negotiation process shall be overseen by a facilitator named by the host local government, after consultation with the citizens facility issues committee, from a list provided by the Department of Community Affairs. The function of the facilitator shall be to assist the petitioners, the host local government, and the permit applicant, if different from the host local government, through the negotiation process. The cost, if any, of the facilitator shall be borne by the permit applicant.

Beginning with the date of the first negotiation meeting called in accordance with subsection (h) of this Code section, there shall be no fewer than three negotiation meetings within the following 45 day period unless waived by consent of the parties. Such negotiation meetings shall be presided over by the facilitator named in subsection (j) of this Code section and shall be for the purpose of assisting the petitioners, the host local government, and the permit applicant, if different from the host local government, to engage in nonbinding negotiation.

Minutes of each meeting and a record of the negotiation process shall be kept by the host local government.

All issues except those which apply to environmental permit conditions are negotiable. Environmental permit conditions are not negotiable. Issues which may be negotiated include but are not limited to:

Operational issues, such as hours of operation;

Recycling efforts that may be implemented;

Protection of property values;

Traffic routing and road maintenance; and

Establishment of local advisory committees.

At the end of the 45 day period following the first negotiation meeting, the facilitator shall publish a notice of the results, if any, of the negotiation process in the same manner as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section and shall include the date, time, and place of a public meeting to be held within ten days after publication at which the input of persons not represented by the citizens facility issues committee may be received.

The negotiated concessions reached by the negotiating parties shall be reduced to writing and executed by the chairman of the citizens facility issues committee and the chief elected official of the host local government and shall be adopted by resolution of the host local government.

If the negotiating parties fail to reach consensus on any issue or issues, the permit applicant may nonetheless proceed to seek a permit from the division. The facilitator shall notify the division in writing that the negotiating parties have failed to reach consensus.

If the negotiating parties reach consensus on negotiated issues, the permit applicant may proceed to seek a permit from the division. The facilitator shall notify the division in writing that the negotiating parties have reached consensus.

Negotiated concessions shall not be construed as environmental permit conditions.

Upon receipt of a written notification from the facilitator that the parties to negotiation have reached consensus or have failed to reach consensus on negotiated issues, and upon written notification from the permit applicant that he wishes to pursue permitting of the solid waste disposal facility for which an application has been filed, the director shall proceed to process the permit in accordance with Code Section

12-8-24

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 13/HB 1216.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, "facility" was substituted for "facilities" in subsection (h).

12-8-33. Recycling Market Development Council.

Effective July 1, 1990, there is created a 15 member Recycling Market Development Council to be appointed as follows:

Seven members appointed by the Governor representing the paper, glass, aluminum, plastic, and ferrous and nonferrous metals industries and trade associations which are active in recycling;

One member who is an elected or appointed municipal official to be appointed by the Governor;

One member who is an elected or appointed member of a county governing authority to be appointed by the Governor;

One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One member appointed by the President of the Senate; and

One representative each from the Department of Administrative Services; the Department of Economic Development; the Department of Community Affairs; and the Department of Natural Resources.

The council shall meet as necessary and shall determine what actions, if any, are needed to facilitate the development and expansion of markets for recovered materials in Georgia and shall prepare an annual report with recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly. The council shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the annual report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

The council shall function for a period of five years from its establishment, at which time it shall either be reauthorized or shall stand abolished.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 13; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 11; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1036, § 11.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-33.1. Improper disposal of computer equipment; Computer Equipment Disposal and Recycling Council created; compensation; powers and duties.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 12/SB 103, effective May 11, 2007.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-8-33.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1086,

§

1.

12-8-34. Labeling rigid plastic containers or bottles.

On and after January 1, 1991, it shall be unlawful to manufacture for use in Georgia or offer for sale in Georgia any rigid plastic container or rigid plastic bottle which is not labeled in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section.

On and after January 1, 1991, any rigid plastic container or rigid plastic bottle manufactured for use in Georgia or offered for sale in Georgia shall be labeled with a code molded into the plastic product which indicates the resin used to produce the bottle or container. Such coding shall conform with the following:

Rigid plastic containers or rigid plastic bottles with basecups or other components of the secondary material may, if the materials are compatible in recycling systems, carry the code of the basic material (even when the basic code is applied to the basecup of the secondary material); otherwise "7-other" is appropriate.

The label code shall consist of a number placed inside a triangle and letters placed below the triangle as required by paragraph (3) of this subsection. The triangle shall be equilateral, formed by three arrows with the apex of each point of the triangle at the midpoint of each arrow, rounded with a short radius. The pointer (arrowhead) of each arrow shall be at the midpoint of each side of the triangle with a short gap separating the pointer from the base of the adjacent arrow. The triangle, formed by the three arrows curved at their midpoints, shall depict a clockwise path around the code number;

The numbers and letters used on labels described in this Code section and their interpretations shall be as follows:

"1-PETE" (polyethylene terephthalate)

"2-HDPE" (high-density polyethylene)

"3-V" (vinyl)

"4-LDPE" (low-density polyethylene)

"5-PP" (polypropylene)

"6-PS" (polystyrene)

"7-OTHER" (all other resins and layered multimaterial)

(Code 1981, §

12-8-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was inserted following "midpoints" in the last sentence of paragraph (b)(2) and in the last item listed in paragraph (b)(3) "all" was substituted for "All" and parentheses were added around language following "7-OTHER".

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a period was deleted at the end of the Code section.

12-8-35. Review of purchases and purchasing specifications, practices, and procedures by commissioner of administrative services.

The commissioner of administrative services shall:

By July 1, 1990, commence a review of all goods and products purchased to determine what percentage of state purchases contain recycled materials, which review shall be completed by December 31, 1991, and, upon completion of his review, file a report of his findings with the General Assembly and the Governor; and

By July 1, 1990, commence a review of the purchasing specifications, practices, and procedures of the State of Georgia, paying particular attention to any procedures and specifications which concern or impact the purchase of recovered materials or goods or products made from recovered or recyclable materials, which review shall be completed by December 31, 1991, and, upon completion of his review, file a report to the Governor and the General Assembly with recommendations for procedures and specifications for state purchasing which promote the increased purchase of goods or products made from recovered materials and goods or products which are recyclable; provided, however, that the commissioner of administrative services shall not propose any procedure or specification which would be economically infeasible or which would cause the state to sacrifice quality or performance standards or would unduly restrict free and open competition among vendors.

In conducting any review required under this Code section, the commissioner of administrative services shall consider those specifications adopted or recommended by the United States government pursuant to 40 C.F.R. Parts 248, 249, 250, 252, and 253.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-36. State agency recycling and collection programs.

The Georgia Building Authority is authorized to establish and coordinate a state-wide recycling program for state agencies and to establish, engage in, contract for, or otherwise allow or arrange for a collection program for recovered materials generated as a result of agency operations, including, but not limited to, aluminum and steel cans, plastic and glass bottles, and all grades of paper, including corrugated cardboard, and for the mulching or composting of yard trimmings. The Georgia Building Authority is authorized to establish procedures for the collection and storage of such materials from any property or building utilized by the state or any agency thereof and to enter into contractual or other arrangements for the transportation, disposition, or sale of such materials. Proceeds generated from such sale shall be used by the Georgia Building Authority for the purpose of offsetting the costs and expenses of administering and implementing the recycling program.

Nothing in this part shall prohibit any state agency from engaging in, contracting for, or otherwise allowing or arranging for its own recycling program for recovered materials generated as a result of its own agency operations.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 786, § 2/HB 310.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 786,

§

1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interests of the state to encourage recycling and that state agencies can contribute to recycling efforts in a meaningful way. The General Assembly further finds that this Act is intended to be a part of the campaign to Make Georgia's Capitol Green."

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Recycling and waste reduction grant program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grant Program Description for Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority, Chapter 267-2.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-37. Financial aid from federal government or other sources.

The director shall be the state representative to receive and administer financial aid from the federal government or other public or nonprofit sources for purposes of solid waste management.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-37.1. State grants authorized.

The state is authorized to make grants, as funds are available, to any county, municipality, or any combination of the same, or to any public authority, agency, commission, or institution, to assist such governmental or public body in the construction of solid waste handling systems which are consistent with local and regional solid waste management plans prepared in accordance with the requirements of this part.

The director shall administer all funds granted by the state pursuant to this Code section.

The corpus of the solid waste trust fund established in Code Section

12-8-27.1

may be used to make grants and loans to cities and counties, any combination of cities and counties, authorities, state agencies, or the Georgia Recycling Market Development Council for the cleanup of solid waste disposal facilities, including those used for the disposal of scrap tires; for the development and implementation of solid waste enforcement programs for the prevention and abatement of illegal dumping of solid waste, including without limitation the prevention and abatement of litter; for the funding of grants or loans, in accordance with procedures developed by the division; for the implementation of innovative technologies for the recycling and reuse of solid waste, including without limitation scrap tires; and for educational and other efforts to promote waste reduction, recycling, and recycling market development.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-37.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1247, § 8/SB 122.)

12-8-38. Funds generated by division; use for operation and maintenance; deposit of unexpended funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department is authorized to retain all miscellaneous funds generated by the division for use in the operation and maintenance of that area.
Any such funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury; provided, further, that the department shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the "Budget Act," except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any such miscellaneous funds.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-39. Cost reimbursement fees; surcharges; exempt contracts; reporting.

Effective January 1, 1992, each city or county which operates a municipal solid waste disposal facility is authorized and required to impose a cost reimbursement fee upon each ton of municipal solid waste or the volume equivalent of a ton, as determined by rules of the division, for each ton of municipal solid waste received at a municipal solid waste disposal facility regardless of its source. The fee imposed may be equal to, or a portion of, the true cost of providing solid waste management services on a per ton or volume equivalent as determined pursuant to the forms, rules, and procedures developed by the Department of Community Affairs.

A minimum of $1.00 per ton or volume equivalent of the cost reimbursement fee specified in this Code section which is received by the city or county, if implemented after March 30, 1990, shall be paid into a local restricted account and shall be used for solid waste management purposes only.

Effective January 1, 1992, when a municipal solid waste disposal facility is operated as a joint venture by more than one city or county or combination thereof, by a special solid waste district, or by an authority, the cost reimbursement fee specified in this Code section shall be imposed by the joint operators, district, or authority and the cost reimbursement fee received shall be administered as outlined in subsection (b) of this Code section and shall be remitted into a restricted account established by the participating local governments.

Until June 30, 2019, when a municipal solid waste disposal facility is operated by private enterprise, the host local government is authorized and required to impose a surcharge of $1.00 per ton or volume equivalent, in addition to any other negotiated charges or fees which shall be imposed by and paid to the host local government for the facility. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, effective July 1, 2019, when a municipal solid waste disposal facility is owned by private enterprise, the host local government is authorized and required to impose a surcharge of $2.50 per ton or volume equivalent, in addition to any other negotiated charges or fees which shall be imposed by and paid to the host local government for the facility.

When a municipal solid waste disposal facility is operated by private enterprise, the host local government is authorized and required to impose a surcharge of $1.00 per ton or volume equivalent for construction or demolition waste or inert waste, in addition to any other negotiated charges or fees which shall be imposed by and paid to the host local government for the facility.

Any contract in existence on September 1, 2020, shall be exempt from the provisions of this subsection until such time as the contract is renewed, replaced, extended, amended, or otherwise changed.

At least 20 percent of the surcharges collected pursuant to this subsection shall be expended for the following purposes:

To offset the impact of the facility;

Public education efforts for solid waste management, hazardous waste management, and litter control;

The cost of solid waste management;

Administration of the local or regional solid waste management plan;

Repair of damage to roads and highways associated with the facility;

Enhancement of litter control programs;

Ground-water and air monitoring and protection associated with the location of the facility;

Remediation and monitoring of closed or abandoned facilities within the jurisdiction of the host local government;

Infrastructure improvements associated with the facility;

Allocation of such funds in any fiscal year to a reserve fund designated for use for the above purposes in future fiscal years; and

For the acquisition of property and interests in property adjacent to or in reasonable proximity to the facility upon a determination by the host local government that such acquisition will serve beautification, environmental, buffering, or recreational purposes such as will ameliorate the impact of the facility.

Those surcharges not expended or allocated as provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be used for other governmental expenses to the extent not required to meet the above or other solid waste management needs.

Host local governments may negotiate for and obtain by contract surcharges higher than those set forth in this subsection; furthermore, nothing in this subsection shall reduce any such surcharge in existence on July 1, 2019.

Owners or operators of any solid waste disposal facility other than an inert waste landfill as defined in regulations promulgated by the board or a private industry solid waste disposal facility shall assess and collect on behalf of the division from each disposer of waste a surcharge of 75› per ton of solid waste disposed. Two percent of said surcharge collected may be retained by the owner or operator of any solid waste disposal facility collecting said surcharge to pay for costs associated with collecting said surcharge. Surcharges assessed and collected on behalf of the division shall be paid to the division not later than the first day of July of each year for the preceding calendar year. Any facility permitted exclusively for the disposal of construction or demolition waste that conducts recycling activities for construction or demolition materials shall receive a credit toward the surcharge listed above per ton of material recycled at the facility.

The surcharge amount provided for in this subsection shall be subject to revision pursuant to Code Section 45-12-92.2.

All surcharges required by subsection (e) of this Code section shall be paid to the division for transfer into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. The division shall collect such fees until the unencumbered principal balance of the hazardous waste trust fund equals or exceeds $25 million, at which time the division shall not collect any further such surcharges until the unencumbered balance in such fund equals or is less than $12.5 million, at which time the division shall resume collection of such surcharges at the beginning of the next calendar year following the year in which such event occurs. The director shall provide written notice to all permitted solid waste disposal facilities at the time he receives notice that the unencumbered balance of such trust fund equals or exceeds $25 million or equals or is less than $12.5 million.

Unless the requirement for the surcharge required by subsection (e) of this Code section is reimposed by the General Assembly, no such surcharge shall be collected after June 30, 2025. The director shall make an annual report to the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee regarding the status of the activities funded by the hazardous waste trust fund.

The division shall advertise to the public the surcharges imposed pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section in accordance with rules promulgated by the board.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, §§ 15, 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 927, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 283, § 2/HB 274; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 856, § 1/HB 276; Ga. L. 2018, p. 228, § 1/HB 792; Ga. L. 2019, p. 261, § 1/HB 220; Ga. L. 2020, p. 25, § 2/SB 123.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective June 30, 2019, in paragraph (e)(1), substituted "Effective until June 30, 2020, owners" for "Owners" at the beginning of the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted "the surcharges listed above" for "such surcharges of 75

›

" near the end of the last sentence; in subsection (g), substituted "surcharges" for "surcharge" near the middle, substituted "are reimposed" for "is reimposed" in the middle, and substituted "July 1, 2022" for "July 1, 2019" at the end.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 29, 2020, substituted "subparagraph (B)" for "subparagraphs (B) and (C)" in the second sentence of subparagraph (d)(1)(A); deleted former subparagraph (d)(1)(B), which read: "When a municipal solid waste disposal facility is operated by private enterprise, the host local government is authorized and required to impose a surcharge of $1.00 per ton or volume equivalent until June 30, 2025, and a surcharge of $2.00 per ton or volume equivalent effective July 1, 2025, for fly ash, bottom ash, boiler slag, or flue gas desulfurization materials generated from burning coal for the purpose of generating electricity by electric utilities and independent power producers, in addition to any other negotiated charges or fees which shall be imposed by and paid to the host local government for the facility."; redesignated former subparagraph (d)(1)(C) as present subparagraph (d)(1)(B); and added subparagraph (d)(1)(C); substituted "20 percent" for "50 percent" in subparagraph (d)(2)A); in paragraph (e)(1), substituted "Owners" for "Effective until June 30, 2020, owners" at the beginning, deleted the former second sentence, which read: "Effective from July 1, 2020, until June 30, 2022, owners or operators of any solid waste disposal facility other than an inert waste landfill as defined in regulations promulgated by the board or a private industry solid waste disposal facility shall assess and collect on behalf of the division from each disposer of waste a surcharge of 51

›

per ton of solid waste disposed.", substituted "surcharge" for "surcharges" in the present second sentence, and substituted "toward the surcharge" for "towards the surcharges" in the last sentence; and, in subsection (g), substituted "surcharge" for "surcharges", substituted "is reimposed" for "are reimposed", substituted "June 30, 2025" for "July 1, 2022", and added the last sentence.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, "March 30, 1990" was substituted for "the effective date of this part" in subsection (b).

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011). For article, "Conservation and Natural Resources:
Waste Management," see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011).
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992). For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 59 (2002).

12-8-39.1. Program for reduction of municipal solid waste on per capita basis.

Effective July 1, 1992, each city or county as a part of its solid waste management plan shall have in effect a program to reduce on a per capita basis the amount of municipal solid waste, as evidenced by the solid waste received at disposal facilities, which are not exempt from subsection (c) of Code Section 12-8-21, within its jurisdiction consistent with the goal established in subsection (c) of Code Section 12-8-21.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-39.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, § 9.)

12-8-39.2. Reports of costs of solid waste management services.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 312, § 2/SB 157, effective July 1, 2011.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-8-39.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412,

§

1.

12-8-39.3. Authorization to enforce collection of taxes, fees, or assessments.

Any city, county, or authority which operates a solid waste handling facility or provides solid waste collection services or both and which levies and collects taxes, fees, or assessments to accomplish the purposes of this part shall be further authorized to enforce by ordinance or resolution the collection of taxes, fees, or assessments due a city, county, or authority in the same manner as authorized by law for the enforcement of the collection and payment of state taxes, fees, or assessments. Any such ordinance or resolution enacted by a county governing authority may provide that the tax commissioner or tax collector of such county shall be the officer charged with the enforcement of its provisions.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to any taxes, fees, or assessments due a county, city, or authority under any ordinance or resolution in effect on July 1, 1992, or adopted thereafter.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-39.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 17; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1081, § 3.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 enactment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-40. Exemption for livestock-feeding facility.

This article shall not apply to any individual, corporation, partnership, or cooperative disposing of livestock-feeding facility waste from facilities with a maximum total capacity of 1,000 cattle or 5,000 swine, provided that if such individual, corporation, partnership, or cooperative shall provide an approved waste disposal system which is capable of properly disposing of the runoff from a "ten-year storm," such individual shall be further exempt regardless of total per head capacity.
Nothing in this part shall limit the right of any person to use poultry or other animal manure for fertilizer.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, "part" was substituted for "article" in the second sentence.